Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.665

Child care workers—Findings—Intent.

The legislature finds that as of 2000, child care workers in the state earned an average hourly wage of eight dollars and twenty-two cents, only fifty-eight percent received medical insurance through employers, only sixty-six percent received paid sick leave, and only seventy-three percent received paid vacation. The legislature further finds that low wages for child care workers create a barrier for individuals entering the profession, result in child care workers leaving the profession in order to earn a living wage in another profession, and make it difficult for child care workers to afford professional education and training. As a result, the availability of quality child care in the state suffers.

The legislature intends to increase wages to child care workers through establishing a child care career and wage ladder that provides increased wages for child care workers based on their work experience, level of responsibility, and education. To the extent practicable within available funds, this child care career and wage ladder shall mirror the successful child care career and wage ladder pilot project operated by the state between 2000 and 2003. While it is the intent of the legislature to establish the vision of a statewide child care career and wage ladder that will enhance employment quality and stability for child care workers, the legislature also recognizes that funding allocations will determine the extent of statewide implementation of a child care career and wage ladder.

[ 2005 c 507 s 1. Formerly RCW 43.215.500, 74.13.097.]